Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska26-119
Protection order; restraining order; violation; arrest, when.

A peace officer shall with or without a warrant arrest a person if:

(1) The officer has probable cause to believe that the person has committed a violation of a protection order described in section 26-118 or a violation of an order excluding a person from certain premises issued pursuant to section 42-357; and

(2) A petitioner or person protected by a protection order or an applicant for an order excluding a person from certain premises issued pursuant to section 42-357 provides the peace officer with a copy of such order or the peace officer determines that such an order exists after communicating with the local law enforcement agency.

Laws 1989, LB 330, § 10;

Laws 1998, LB 218, § 25;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 42-928;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 19.